Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.820

Olympic natural resources center—Administration—Policy advisory board.

(1) The Olympic natural resources center shall operate under the authority of the board of regents of the University of Washington. It shall be administered by a director appointed jointly by the directors of the school of environmental and forest sciences and the school of aquatic and fishery sciences. The director of the center shall be a member of the faculty of one of those schools. The director of the center shall appoint and maintain a scientific or technical committee, and other committees as necessary, to advise the director on the efficiency, effectiveness, and quality of the center's activities.

(2) The governor must appoint a policy advisory board consisting of eleven members, who serve at the pleasure of the governor, to advise the directors of the school of environmental and forest sciences, the school of aquatic and fishery sciences, and the Olympic natural resources center on policies for the center that are consistent with its purposes. Membership on the policy advisory board must broadly represent the various interests concerned with the purposes of the center, including the Washington state department of natural resources and state and federal government, environmental, local community, timber industry, and tribal interests. Policy advisory board members shall serve four-year terms and are eligible for reappointment.

(3) Service on boards and committees of the Olympic natural resources center is without compensation but actual travel expenses incurred in connection with service to the center may be reimbursed from appropriated funds in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2012 c 243 s 1; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 74; 1991 c 316 s 3. Formerly RCW 76.12.220.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Severability—1991 c 316: See note following RCW 43.30.800.